Final source/morphy/foma/particles.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL +LOC +UN
LEXICON Root
ParticlesStem;

LEXICON ParticlesStem
	
	
ද	Particles;
ය	Particles;
ම	Particles;
නම්	Particles;
දී	Particles;
යි	Particles;
ඇත	Particles;
නිසා	Particles;
ව	Particles;
විට	Particles;
කොට	Particles;
යුතු	Particles;
නො	Particles;
නැත	Particles;
නෑ	Particles;
වඩා	Particles;
ඉතා	Particles;
නැහැ	Particles;
පමණක්	Particles;
මහා	Particles;
පමණ	Particles;
නොවේ	Particles;
නොව	Particles;
යනු	Particles;
සහිත	Particles;
හරි	Particles;
පවා	Particles;
තමයි	Particles;
එනම්	Particles;
බැවින්	Particles;
වඩාත්	Particles;
එවැනි	Particles;
ආදී	Particles;
පැවති	Particles;
වත්	Particles;
පමණි	Particles;
වෙන්	Particles;
ඕනෑ	Particles;
එපා	Particles;
එවිට	Particles;
යනුවෙන්	Particles;
ඔව්	Particles;
ඉතින්	Particles;
ඇයි	Particles;
තෙක්	Particles;
මොකද	Particles;
බැව්	Particles;
ඕන	Particles;
යුත්	Particles;
හොත්	Particles;
අයුරින්	Particles;
අයුරු	Particles;
වනාහි	Particles;
නැත්නම්	Particles;
යුක්ත	Particles;
නේද	Particles;
බැහැ	Particles;
හැටි	Particles;
බෑ	Particles;
තවදුරටත්	Particles;
තුරු	Particles;
හරියට	Particles;
නැද්ද	Particles;
ඉතාමත්	Particles;
එතකොට	Particles;
ලත්	Particles;
ලෙසින්	Particles;
සහගත	Particles;
වැනිදා	Particles;
ඕනෙ	Particles;
සැටි	Particles;
බැගින්	Particles;
යනුවෙනි	Particles;
උප	Particles;
යැ	Particles;
ඔන්න	Particles;
විතරක්	Particles;
සේක	Particles;
පස්සේ	Particles;
නිසාම	Particles;
හරිම	Particles;
මොනවා	Particles;
අන්න	Particles;
විටෙක	Particles;
ඉදින්	Particles;
මන්ද	Particles;
සඳ	Particles;
තවද	Particles;
සමගම	Particles;
මොනවද	Particles;
එවන්	Particles;
මෙන්න	Particles;
අන්දමින්	Particles;
වේවා	Particles;
වෙනි	Particles;
හුදෙක්	Particles;
නොමැතිව	Particles;
විතර	Particles;
විටම	Particles;
නිසාත්	Particles;
ඇත්නම්	Particles;
පාහේ	Particles;
රහිත	Particles;
දැනටමත්	Particles;
මෑත	Particles;
කෝ	Particles;
තාක්	Particles;
පෙරේදා	Particles;
විටක	Particles;
සම්පන්න	Particles;
මැනවි	Particles;
ල	Particles;
මැ	Particles;
සමඟම	Particles;
එතෙක්	Particles;
ඈතින්	Particles;
පාසා	Particles;
මෙහා	Particles;
හින්දා	Particles;
හරියටම	Particles;
විරහිත	Particles;
හෙබි	Particles;
නොමිලේ	Particles;
එවක	Particles;
පමණට	Particles;
ආයුබෝවන්	Particles;
වෙනිදා	Particles;
නිති	Particles;
ලු	Particles;
නොමිලයේ	Particles;
කොල	Particles;
සේක්වා	Particles;
එනයින්	Particles;
විරහිතව	Particles;
මනන්	Particles;
එම්බල	Particles;
ලත	Particles;
හාපුරා	Particles;
හින්දම	Particles;
කොයිබට	Particles;
ඉතිර	Particles;
සොඳේ	Particles;
කොයිබ	Particles;
සටපට	Particles;
සටසට	Particles;





LEXICON Particles

+N+RT: #;
